Florida, session 2026, SB1196.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsections (2) through (23) of section 15 403.706, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (3) 16 through (24), respectively, a new subsection (2) is added to 17 that section, and present subsections (4), (6), (7), and (20) 18 are amended, to read: 19 403.706âLocal government solid waste responsibilities.â 20 (2)(a)âA local government may not issue a construction 21 permit pursuant to s. 403.707 for a new solid waste disposal 22 facility that uses an ash-producing incinerator or for a waste 23 to-energy facility if the proposed location of such facility is 24 sited within a 2-mile radius, as measured from the stack, of any 25 impoundment area authorized by Congress with an effective 26 interior storage of at least 100 acres for purposes of 27 capturing, storing, and distributing surface water; improving 28 hydroperiods and hydropatterns in any water conservation area; 29 increasing the spatial extent of wetlands; benefiting any 30 federally listed threatened and endangered species; flood 31 mitigation; or groundwater recharge. 32 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to the following: 33 1.âAny canal. 34 2.âAny existing construction, current operation, or 35 modification to such structure or operation in existence as of 36 July 1, 2026. 37 3.âAny parcel located in a county with a population of less 38 than 1.7 million according to the most recent decennial census. 39 (5)(4)(a)âIn order to promote the production of renewable 40 energy from solid waste, each megawatt-hour produced by a 41 renewable energy facility using solid waste as a fuel shall 42 count as 1 ton of recycled material and shall be applied toward 43 meeting the recycling goals set forth in this section. If a 44 county creating renewable energy from solid waste implements and 45 maintains a program to recycle at least 50 percent of municipal 46 solid waste by a means other than creating renewable energy, 47 that county shall count 1.25 tons of recycled material for each 48 megawatt-hour produced. If waste originates from a county other 49 than the county in which the renewable energy facility resides, 50 the originating county shall receive such recycling credit. Any 51 byproduct resulting from the creation of renewable energy that 52 is recycled shall count towards the county recycling goals in 53 accordance with the methods and criteria developed pursuant to 54 paragraph (3)(h) (2)(h). 55 (b)âA county may receive credit for one-half of the 56 recycling goal set forth in subsection (3) (2) from the use of 57 yard trash, or other clean wood waste or paper waste, in 58 innovative programs including, but not limited to, programs that 59 produce alternative clean-burning fuels such as ethanol or that 60 provide for the conversion of yard trash or other clean wood 61 waste or paper waste to clean-burning fuel for the production of 62 energy for use at facilities other than a waste-to-energy 63 facility as defined in s. 403.7061. The provisions of this 64 paragraph apply only if a county can demonstrate that: 65 1.âThe county has implemented a yard trash mulching or 66 composting program, and 67 2.âAs part of the program, compost and mulch made from yard 68 trash is available to the general public and in use at county 69 owned or maintained and municipally owned or maintained 70 facilities in the county and state agencies operating in the 71 county as required by this section. 72 (c)âA county with a population of 100,000 or less may 73 provide its residents with the opportunity to recycle in lieu of 74 achieving the goal set forth in this section. For the purposes 75 of this section, the âopportunity to recycleâ means that the 76 county: 77 1.a.âProvides a system for separating and collecting 78 recyclable materials prior to disposal that is located at a 79 solid waste management facility or solid waste disposal area; or 80 b.âProvides a system of places within the county for 81 collection of source-separated recyclable materials. 82 2.âProvides a public education and promotion program that 83 is conducted to inform its residents of the opportunity to 84 recycle, encourages source separation of recyclable materials, 85 and promotes the benefits of reducing, reusing, recycling, and 86 composting materials. 87 (7)(6)âThe department may reduce or modify the municipal 88 solid waste recycling goal that a county is required to achieve 89 pursuant to subsection (3) (2) if the county demonstrates to the 90 department that: 91 (a)âThe achievement of the goal set forth in subsection (3) 92 (2) would have an adverse effect on the financial obligations of 93 a county that are directly related to a waste-to-energy facility 94 owned or operated by or on behalf of the county; and 95 (b)âThe county cannot remove normally combustible materials 96 from solid waste that is to be processed at a waste-to-energy 97 facility because of the need to maintain a sufficient amount of 98 solid waste to ensure the financial viability of the facility. 99 100 The goal shall not be waived entirely and may only be reduced or 101 modified to the extent necessary to alleviate the adverse 102 effects of achieving the goal on the financial viability of a 103 countyâs waste-to-energy facility. Nothing in this subsection 104 shall exempt a county from developing and implementing a 105 recycling program pursuant to this act. 106 (8)(7)âIn order to assess the progress in meeting the goal 107 set forth in subsection (3) (2), each county shall, by April 1 108 each year, provide information to the department regarding its 109 annual solid waste management program and recycling activities. 110 (a)âThe information submitted to the department by the 111 county must, at a minimum, include: 112 1.âThe amount of municipal solid waste disposed of at solid 113 waste disposal facilities, by type of waste such as yard trash, 114 white goods, clean debris, tires, and unseparated solid waste; 115 2.âThe amount and type of materials from the municipal 116 solid waste stream that were recycled; and 117 3.âThe percentage of the population participating in 118 various types of recycling activities instituted. 119 (b)âBeginning with the data for the 2012 calendar year, the 120 department shall by July 1 each year post on its website the 121 recycling rates of each county for the prior calendar year. 122 (21)(20)âIn addition to any other penalties provided by 123 law, a local government that does not comply with the 124 requirements of subsections (3) (2) and (5) is (4) shall not be 125 eligible for grants from the Solid Waste Management Trust Fund, 126 and the department may notify the Chief Financial Officer to 127 withhold payment of all or a portion of funds payable to the 128 local government by the department from the General Revenue Fund 129 or by the department from any other state fund, to the extent 130 not pledged to retire bonded indebtedness, unless the local 131 government demonstrates that good faith efforts to meet the 132 requirements of subsections (3) (2) and (5) (4) have been made 133 or that the funds are being or will be used to finance the 134 correction of a pollution control problem that spans 135 jurisdictional boundaries. 136 Section 2.âPresent subsections (6) through (14) of section 137 403.707, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7) 138 through (15), respectively, and a new subsection (6) is added to 139 that section, to read: 140 403.707âPermits.â 141 (6)(a)âThe department may not issue a construction permit 142 pursuant to this section for a new solid waste disposal facility 143 that uses an ash-producing incinerator or for a waste-to-energy 144 facility if the proposed location of such facility is sited 145 within a 2-mile radius, as measured from the stack, of any 146 impoundment area authorized by Congress with an effective 147 interior storage of at least 100 acres for purposes of 148 capturing, storing, and distributing surface water; improving 149 hydroperiods and hydropatterns in any water conservation area; 150 increasing the spatial extent of wetlands; benefiting any 151 federally listed threatened and endangered species; flood 152 mitigation; or groundwater recharge. 153 (b)âParagraph (a) does not apply to the following: 154 1.âAny canal. 155 2.âAny existing construction, current operation, or 156 modification to such structure or operation in existence as of 157 July 1, 2026. 158 3.âAny parcel located in a county with a population of less 159 than 1.7 million according to the most recent decennial census. 160 Section 3.âParagraph (b) of subsection (6) and subsections 161 (7) and (21) of section 403.703, Florida Statutes, are amended 162 to read: 163 403.703âDefinitions.âAs used in this part, the term: 164 (6)ââConstruction and demolition debrisâ means discarded 165 materials generally considered to be not water-soluble and 166 nonhazardous in nature, including, but not limited to, steel, 167 glass, brick, concrete, asphalt roofing material, pipe, gypsum 168 wallboard, and lumber, from the construction or destruction of a 169 structure as part of a construction or demolition project or 170 from the renovation of a structure, and includes rocks, soils, 171 tree remains, trees, and other vegetative matter that normally 172 results from land clearing or land development operations for a 173 construction project, including such debris from construction of 174 structures at a site remote from the construction or demolition 175 project site. Mixing of construction and demolition debris with 176 other types of solid waste will cause the resulting mixture to 177 be classified as other than construction and demolition debris. 178 The term also includes: 179 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 403.707(10)(j) s. 180 403.707(9)(j), yard trash and unpainted, nontreated wood scraps 181 and wood pallets from sources other than construction or 182 demolition projects; 183 (7)ââCounty,â or any like term, means a political 184 subdivision of the state established pursuant to s. 1, Art. VIII 185 of the State Constitution and, when s. 403.706(20) s. 186 403.706(19) applies, means a special district or other entity. 187 (21)ââMunicipality,â or any like term, means a municipality 188 created pursuant to general or special law authorized or 189 recognized pursuant to s. 2 or s. 6, Art. VIII of the State 190 Constitution and, when s. 403.706(20) s. 403.706(19) applies, 191 means a special district or other entity. 192 Section 4.âSubsection (5) of section 403.7049, Florida 193 Statutes, is amended to read: 194 403.7049âDetermination of full cost for solid waste 195 management; local solid waste management fees.â 196 (5)âIn order to assist in achieving the municipal solid 197 waste reduction goal and the recycling provisions of s. 198 403.706(3) s. 403.706(2), a county or a municipality which owns 199 or operates a solid waste management facility is hereby 200 authorized to charge solid waste disposal fees which may vary 201 based on a number of factors, including, but not limited to, the 202 amount, characteristics, and form of recyclable materials 203 present in the solid waste that is brought to the countyâs or 204 the municipalityâs facility for processing or disposal. 205 Section 5.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) and subsection 206 (3) of section 403.705, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 207 403.705âState solid waste management program.â 208 (2)âThe state solid waste management program shall include, 209 at a minimum: 210 (c)âPlanning guidelines and technical assistance to 211 counties and municipalities to aid in meeting the municipal 212 solid waste recycling goals established in s. 403.706(3) s. 213 403.706(2). 214 (3)âThe department shall evaluate and report biennially to 215 the President of the Senate and the Speaker of the House of 216 Representatives on the stateâs success in meeting the solid 217 waste recycling goal as described in s. 403.706(3) s. 218 403.706(2). 219 Section 6.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.